dictionaries/mn_MN/src/mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX D2 Y 81
SFX D2 0 /0608 .
SFX D2 0 д/02 [лм]
SFX D2 0 ийг/02 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 ийн [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 өө [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 өөр/02 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 өрхүү/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 өөс/02 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 өд/02 [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX D2 0 т/02 [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX D2 0 т/02 [бврфп]
SFX D2 0 ийнх/060872 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 0 ийнхөрхүү/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX D2 ил лийг/02 ил
SFX D2 ил лийн ил
SFX D2 ил лөө ил
SFX D2 ил лөөр/02 ил
SFX D2 ил лөрхүү/070873 ил
SFX D2 ил лөөс/02 ил
SFX D2 ил лийнх/060872 ил
SFX D2 ил лийнхөрхүү/070873 ил
SFX D2 им мийг/02 им
SFX D2 им мийн им
SFX D2 им мөө им
SFX D2 им мөөр/02 им
SFX D2 им мөрхүү/070873 им
SFX D2 им мөөс/02 им
SFX D2 им мийнх/060872 им
SFX D2 им мийнхөрхүү/070873 им
SFX D2 өж жид/02 өж
SFX D2 өж жийг/02 өж
SFX D2 өж жийн өж
SFX D2 өж жийнх/060872 өж
SFX D2 өж жийнхөрхүү/070873 өж
SFX D2 өж жөө өж
SFX D2 өж жөөр/02 өж
SFX D2 өж жирхүү/070873 өж
SFX D2 өж жөөс/02 өж
SFX D2 өл лийг/02 өл
SFX D2 өл лийн өл
SFX D2 өл лөө өл
SFX D2 өл лөөр/02 өл
SFX D2 өл лөрхүү/070873 өл
SFX D2 өл лөөс/02 өл
SFX D2 өл лийнх/060872 өл
SFX D2 өл лийнхөрхүү/070873 өл
SFX D2 өм мийг/02 өм
SFX D2 өм мийн өм
SFX D2 өм мөө өм
SFX D2 өм мөөр/02 өм
SFX D2 өм мөрхүү/070873 өм
SFX D2 өм мөөс/02 өм
SFX D2 өм мийнх/060872 өм
SFX D2 өм мийнхөрхүү/070873 өм
SFX D2 өч чид/02 өч
SFX D2 өч чийг/02 өч
SFX D2 өч чийн өч
SFX D2 өч чийнх/060872 өч
SFX D2 өч чийнхөрхүү/070873 өч
SFX D2 өч чөө өч
SFX D2 өч чөөр/02 өч
SFX D2 өч чирхүү/070873 өч
SFX D2 өч чөөс/02 өч
SFX D2 ич чид/02 ич
SFX D2 ич чийг/02 ич
SFX D2 ич чийн ич
SFX D2 ич чийнх/060872 ич
SFX D2 ич чийнхөрхүү/070873 ич
SFX D2 ич чөө ич
SFX D2 ич чөөр/02 ич
SFX D2 ич чирхүү/070873 ич
SFX D2 ич чөөс/02 ич
SFX D2 өш шид/02 өш
SFX D2 өш шийг/02 өш
SFX D2 өш шийн өш
SFX D2 өш шийнх/060872 өш
SFX D2 өш шийнхөрхүү/070873 өш
SFX D2 өш шөө өш
SFX D2 өш шөөр/02 өш
SFX D2 өш ширхүү/070873 өш
SFX D2 өш шөөс/02 өш

SFX D3 Y 81
SFX D3 0 /0708 .
SFX D3 0 д/03 [лм]
SFX D3 0 ийг/03 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 ийн [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 эд/03 [^аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX D3 0 т/03 [аоэөийуүёяюеьы]с
SFX D3 0 т/03 [бврфп]
SFX D3 0 ийнх/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 ийнхэрхүү/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 ээ [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 ээр/03 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 эрхүү/070873 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 0 ээс/03 [врсбпф]
SFX D3 ил лийг/03 ил
SFX D3 ил лийн ил
SFX D3 ил лийнх/070873 ил
SFX D3 ил лийнхэрхүү/070873 ил
SFX D3 ил лээ ил
SFX D3 ил лээр/03 ил
SFX D3 ил лэрхүү/070873 ил
SFX D3 ил лээс/03 ил
SFX D3 им мийг/03 им
SFX D3 им мийн им
SFX D3 им мийнх/070873 им
SFX D3 им мийнхэрхүү/070873 им
SFX D3 им мээ им
SFX D3 им мээр/03 им
SFX D3 им мэрхүү/070873 им
SFX D3 им мээс/03 им
SFX D3 эж жид/03 эж
SFX D3 эж жийг/03 эж
SFX D3 эж жийн эж
SFX D3 эж жийнх/070873 эж
SFX D3 эж жийнхэрхүү/070873 эж
SFX D3 эж жээ эж
SFX D3 эж жээр/03 эж
SFX D3 эж жирхүү/070873 эж
SFX D3 эж жээс/03 эж
SFX D3 эл лийг/03 эл
SFX D3 эл лийн эл
SFX D3 эл лийнх/070873 эл
SFX D3 эл лийнхэрхүү/070873 эл
SFX D3 эл лээ эл
SFX D3 эл лээр/03 эл
SFX D3 эл лэрхүү/070873 эл
SFX D3 эл лээс/03 эл
SFX D3 эм мийг/03 эм
SFX D3 эм мийн эм
SFX D3 эм мийнх/070873 эм
SFX D3 эм мийнхэрхүү/070873 эм
SFX D3 эм мээ эм
SFX D3 эм мээр/03 эм
SFX D3 эм мэрхүү/070873 эм
SFX D3 эм мээс/03 эм
SFX D3 эч чид/03 эч
SFX D3 эч чийг/03 эч
SFX D3 эч чийн эч
SFX D3 эч чийнх/070873 эч
SFX D3 эч чийнхэрхүү/070873 эч
SFX D3 эч чээ эч
SFX D3 эч чээр/03 эч
SFX D3 эч чирхүү/070873 эч
SFX D3 эч чээс/03 эч
SFX D3 ич чид/03 ич
SFX D3 ич чийг/03 ич
SFX D3 ич чийн ич
SFX D3 ич чийнх/070873 ич
SFX D3 ич чийнхэрхүү/070873 ич
SFX D3 ич чээ ич
SFX D3 ич чээр/03 ич
SFX D3 ич чирхүү/070873 ич
SFX D3 ич чээс/03 ич
SFX D3 эш шид/03 эш
SFX D3 эш шийг/03 эш
SFX D3 эш шийн эш
SFX D3 эш шийнх/070873 эш
SFX D3 эш шийнхэрхүү/070873 эш
SFX D3 эш шээ эш
SFX D3 эш шээр/03 эш
SFX D3 эш ширхүү/070873 эш
SFX D3 эш шээс/03 эш

SFX E0 Y 53
SFX E0 0 /0408 .
SFX E0 0 т/00 [вг]
SFX E0 0 ад/00 [^аийуя]с
SFX E0 0 т/00 [аийуя]с
SFX E0 ав ваа ав
SFX E0 ав ваар/00 ав
SFX E0 ав вархуу/040870 ав
SFX E0 ав ваас/00 ав
SFX E0 ав выг/00 ав
SFX E0 ав вын ав
SFX E0 ав вынх/040870 ав
SFX E0 ав вынхархуу/040870 ав
SFX E0 аг гаа аг
SFX E0 аг гаар/00 аг
SFX E0 аг гархуу/040870 аг
SFX E0 аг гаас/00 аг
SFX E0 аг гийг/00 аг
SFX E0 аг гийн аг
SFX E0 аг гийнх/040870 аг
SFX E0 аг гийнхархуу/040870 аг
SFX E0 ас саа ас
SFX E0 ас саар/00 ас
SFX E0 ас сархуу/040870 ас
SFX E0 ас саас/00 ас
SFX E0 ас сыг/00 ас
SFX E0 ас сын ас
SFX E0 ас сынх/040870 ас
SFX E0 ас сынхархуу/040870 ас
SFX E0 иг гаа иг
SFX E0 иг гаар/00 иг
SFX E0 иг гархуу/040870 иг
SFX E0 иг гаас/00 иг
SFX E0 иг гийг/00 иг
SFX E0 иг гийн иг
SFX E0 иг гийнх/040870 иг
SFX E0 иг гийнхархуу/040870 иг
SFX E0 ис саа ис
SFX E0 ис саар/00 ис
SFX E0 ис сархуу/040870 ис
SFX E0 ис саас/00 ис
SFX E0 ис сыг/00 ис
SFX E0 ис сын ис
SFX E0 ис сынх/040870 ис
SFX E0 ис сынхархуу/040870 ис
SFX E0 0 нд/00 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 ны [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 ных/040870 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 ныхархуу/040870 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 г/00 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 наас/00 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 гаар/00 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 гархуу/040870 [ийеаоу]
SFX E0 0 н [ийеаоу]

SFX E1 Y 53
SFX E1 0 /0508 .
SFX E1 0 т/01 [вг]
SFX E1 0 од/01 [^оийуё]с
SFX E1 0 т/01 [оийуё]с
SFX E1 иг гийг/01 иг
SFX E1 иг гийн иг
SFX E1 иг гийнх/050871 иг
SFX E1 иг гийнхорхуу/040870 иг
SFX E1 иг гоо иг
SFX E1 иг гоор/01 иг
SFX E1 иг горхуу/01 иг
SFX E1 иг гоос/01 иг
SFX E1 ис соо ис
SFX E1 ис соор/01 ис
SFX E1 ис сорхуу/040870 ис
SFX E1 ис соос/01 ис
SFX E1 ис сыг/01 ис
SFX E1 ис сын ис
SFX E1 ис сынх/050871 ис
SFX E1 ис сынхорхуу/040870 ис
SFX E1 ов воо ов
SFX E1 ов воор/01 ов
SFX E1 ов ворхуу/040870 ов
SFX E1 ов воос/01 ов
SFX E1 ов выг/01 ов
SFX E1 ов вын ов
SFX E1 ов вынх/050871 ов
SFX E1 ов вынхорхуу/040870 ов
SFX E1 ог гийг/01 ог
SFX E1 ог гийн ог
SFX E1 ог гийнх/050871 ог
SFX E1 ог гийнхорхуу/040870 ог
SFX E1 ог гоо ог
SFX E1 ог гоор/01 ог
SFX E1 ог горхуу/040870 ог
SFX E1 ог гоос/01 ог
SFX E1 ос соо ос
SFX E1 ос соор/01 ос
SFX E1 ос сорхуу/040870 ос
SFX E1 ос соос/01 ос
SFX E1 ос сыг/01 ос
SFX E1 ос сын ос
SFX E1 ос сынх/050871 ос
SFX E1 ос сынхорхуу/040870 ос
SFX E1 0 нд/01 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 ны [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 ных/050871 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 ныхорхуу/040870 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 г/01 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 ноос/01 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 гоор/01 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 горхуу/040870 [ийеаоу]
SFX E1 0 н [ийеаоу]

SFX E2 Y 44
SFX E2 0 /0608 .
SFX E2 0 т/02 [вг]
SFX E2 0 өд/02 [^оийүе]с
SFX E2 0 т/02 [оийүе]с
SFX E2 иг гийг/02 иг
SFX E2 иг гийн иг
SFX E2 иг гийнх/060872 иг
SFX E2 иг гийнхөрхүү/070873 иг
SFX E2 иг гөө иг
SFX E2 иг гөөр/02 иг
SFX E2 иг гөрхүү/070873 иг
SFX E2 иг гөөс/02 иг
SFX E2 ис сийг/02 ис
SFX E2 ис сийн ис
SFX E2 ис сөө ис
SFX E2 ис сөөр/02 ис
SFX E2 ис сөрхүү/070873 ис
SFX E2 ис сөөс/02 ис
SFX E2 ис сийнх/060872 ис
SFX E2 ис сийнхөрхүү/070873 ис
SFX E2 өв вийг/02 өв
SFX E2 өв вийн өв
SFX E2 өв вөө өв
SFX E2 өв вөөр/02 өв
SFX E2 өв вөрхүү/070873 өв
SFX E2 өв вөөс/02 өв
SFX E2 өв вийнх/060872 өв
SFX E2 өв вийнхөрхүү/070873 өв
SFX E2 өг гийг/02 өг
SFX E2 өг гийн өг
SFX E2 өг гийнх/060872 өг
SFX E2 өг гийнхөрхүү/070873 өг
SFX E2 өг гөө өг
SFX E2 өг гөөр/02 өг
SFX E2 өг гөрхүү/070873 өг
SFX E2 өг гөөс/02 өг
SFX E2 өс сийг/02 өс
SFX E2 өс сийн өс
SFX E2 өс сөө өс
SFX E2 өс сөөр/02 өс
SFX E2 өс сөрхүү/070873 өс
SFX E2 өс сөөс/02 өс
SFX E2 өс сийнх/060872 өс
SFX E2 өс сийнхөрхүү/070873 өс

SFX E3 Y 53
SFX E3 0 /0708 .
SFX E3 0 т/03 [вг]
SFX E3 0 эд/03 [^эийүе]с
SFX E3 0 т/03 [эийүе]с
SFX E3 иг гийг/03 иг
SFX E3 иг гийн иг
SFX E3 иг гийнх/070873 иг
SFX E3 иг гийнхэрхүү/070873 иг
SFX E3 иг гээ иг
SFX E3 иг гээр/03 иг
SFX E3 иг гэрхүү/070873 иг
SFX E3 иг гээс/03 иг
SFX E3 ис сийг/03 ис
SFX E3 ис сийн ис
SFX E3 ис сийнх/070873 ис
SFX E3 ис сийнхэрхүү/070873 ис
SFX E3 ис сээ ис
SFX E3 ис сээр/03 ис
SFX E3 ис сэрхүү/070873 ис
SFX E3 ис сээс/03 ис
SFX E3 эв вийг/03 эв
SFX E3 эв вийн эв
SFX E3 эв вийнх/070873 эв
SFX E3 эв вийнхэрхүү/070873 эв
SFX E3 эв вээ эв
SFX E3 эв вээр/03 эв
SFX E3 эв вэрхүү/070873 эв
SFX E3 эв вээс/03 эв
SFX E3 эг гийг/03 эг
SFX E3 эг гийн эг
SFX E3 эг гийнх/070873 эг
SFX E3 эг гийнхэрхүү/070873 эг
SFX E3 эг гээ эг
SFX E3 эг гээр/03 эг
SFX E3 эг гэрхүү/070873 эг
SFX E3 эг гээс/03 эг
SFX E3 эс сийг/03 эс
SFX E3 эс сийн эс
SFX E3 эс сийнх/070873 эс
SFX E3 эс сийнхэрхүү/070873 эс
SFX E3 эс сээ эс
SFX E3 эс сээр/03 эс
SFX E3 эс сэрхүү/070873 эс
SFX E3 эс сээс/03 эс
SFX E3 0 нд/03 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 ний [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 нийх/070873 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 нийхэрхүү/070873 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 г/03 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 нээс/03 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 гээр/03 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 гэрхүү/070873 [ийеэү]
SFX E3 0 н [ийеэү]
